District of Columbia statutes.
42-1401

Sale of life estate and contingent remainder in issue upon application of life tenant.

Where real estate is limited to 1 or more for life, with a contingent limitation over to such issue of 1 or more of the tenants for life as shall be living at the death of their parent or parents, and the deed or will does not prohibit a sale, said court may, on the application of the tenants for life, and if the court shall be of opinion that it is expedient to do so, order a sale of such estate and decree to the purchaser an absolute and complete title in fee simple.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1205, ch. 854, § 97
1981 Ed., § 45-1001.
1973 Ed., § 45-1101.